Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 646A.115 is amended to read:
646A.115. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Admission ticket” means evidence of a purchaser’s right of entry to a venue other  than a
commercial motion picture theater or an entertainment event other than a movie shown at a com-
mercial motion picture theater.
(b)(A) “Entertainment event” means a  performance, recreation, amusement, diversion, spectacle,
show or similar event that occurs in this state including, but not limited  to, a theatrical or musical
performance, concert, film, game, ride or sporting event.
(B) “Entertainment event” does not include a trade show.
(c) “Initial sale” means a ticket seller’s first sale of an admission ticket to a purchaser.
(d) “Operator” means a  person that owns, operates or controls a venue or that produces or
promotes an entertainment event, or the person’s agent or employee.
(e) “Presale” means a sale of admission tickets to a  selected group of purchasers with the per-
mission of the ticket seller before admission tickets become available for purchase to  the general
public.
(f) “Promoter” means a person that organizes financing or  publicity for an entertainment event,
or the person’s agent or employee.
(g) “Purchaser” means an individual who purchases an admission ticket as admission to  an
entertainment event.
(h) “Resale” means a  sale other than a ticket seller or an operator’s initial sale of an admission
ticket for a venue that is located in or an entertainment event that occurs  in this state, irrespective
of the location in which the sale occurs or the means by which a reseller solicits or  advertises the
sale or delivers or receives payment for the admission ticket.
(i) “Reseller” means a person other than a ticket seller or an operator that conducts a resale,
or the person’s agent or employee.
(j) “Ticket seller” means a person, including but not limited to an operator or  promoter, that
makes an admission ticket available for  presale or an initial sale to a purchaser or reseller, or the
person’s agent or employee.
(k) “Venue” means a location in which an entertainment event  occurs, entry to which requires
an admission ticket.
Enrolled House Bill 4024 (HB 4024-INTRO) Page 1
(2)(a) A person may not willfully  sell or use software, the purpose of which is to circumvent,
thwart, interfere with or evade a control or measure, including a security measure  or an access
control system, that an operator, ticket seller or reseller establishes or uses to ensure an  equitable
distribution, sale or resale of admission tickets for an entertainment event, including a public  or
private presale of admission tickets, or to limit the  number of admission tickets a single purchaser
may purchase from a ticket seller or reseller.
(b) A person may not willfully sell or offer to sell an admission ticket that  the person obtained
using software described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3)(a) Except  as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person may not, without prior
written authorization, willfully:
(A) Use or cause another person to use an Internet domain name or subdomain name if the  do-
main name or subdomain name:
(i) Names the venue;
(ii) Names the entertainment event  or an individual or entity that is scheduled to appear or
perform at the entertainment event; or
(iii) Is substantially similar to the name of the venue,  of the entertainment event or of a person
or entity that is scheduled to appear or perform at the entertainment event; or
(B) Publish or cause another person to publish a website that has or uses:
(i) Text, images, graphics, a design or other  material that individually or in combination is so
substantially similar to the intellectual property  of an operator or venue as to mislead a reasonable
visitor to the website into believing that the website is affiliated with the operator or venue; or
(ii) Text, images, graphics or a design that states or implies, including by use of the word “of-
ficial,” that the website is affiliated with or endorsed by an operator or venue or  an individual or
entity that is scheduled to appear or perform at an entertainment event.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to a person that is licensed to use an  image
of, or is otherwise authorized to act on behalf of:
(A) A venue, a promoter or  another person that is scheduled to appear or perform at an enter-
tainment event; or
(B) A promoter or sponsor of:
(i) The entertainment event; or
(ii) A person that is scheduled to appear or perform at the entertainment event.
(c) A seating chart of a venue or  a picture of a view from a seat in a venue does not constitute
text, images, graphics or a design  that a person may not publish or cause another person to publish
under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(4) A reseller or person affiliated with a reseller may not  offer for resale or engage in a
resale of an admission ticket unless the reseller or person affiliated with the reseller:
(a) Has actual or constructive possession of the admission ticket; or
(b) Has explicit authorization in a written contract with an operator to obtain the  ad-
mission ticket from  the operator, a ticket seller or a person that the operator or ticket seller
authorized to purchase the admission ticket  from the operator or ticket seller in an initial
sale.
[(4)] (5)  Violation of this section is an unlawful practice under ORS 646.608  that is subject to
an action under ORS 646.632 and 646.638.
SECTION 2.
This 2026 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4024 (HB 4024-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by House February 10, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 25, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4024 (HB 4024-INTRO) Page 3